Missouri, session 2026, HB2086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 484.040, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 484.040, to read as follows:
484.040. 1. Except as provided under subsection 2 of this section, the power to
admit and license persons to practice as attorneys and counselors in the courts of record of
this state, or in any of them, is hereby vested exclusively in the supreme court and shall be
regulated by rules of that court.
2. No person admitted and licensed to practice law in this state shall, as part of
his or her continuing legal education requirements, be required to obtain credit devoted
exclusively to explicit or implicit bias, diversity, inclusion, or cultural competency.
3. The provisions of this section amend Missouri supreme court rule 15.05
relating to continuing legal education requirements for attorneys, and the provisions of
this section shall govern if there is a conflict between this section and Missouri supreme
court rule 15.05 as it relates to attorneys obtaining continuing legal education credit
devoted exclusively to explicit or implicit bias, diversity, inclusion, or cultural
competency.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.